src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 268
 +Inf:%>itte # ;
 +Inf:%>itta # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>itt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ittast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>ittande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 268J
 +Inf:%>itte # ;
 +Inf:%>itta # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>it # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ittast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>ittande # ;
 +Imp:%>itt # ;

LEXICON 268K1
 +Inf:%>itte # ;
 +Inf:%>itta # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>itt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ittas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>ittande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 268K2
 +Inf:%>itte # ;
 +Inf:%>itta # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>itter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ittas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>ittande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 268KL
 +Inf:%>itte # ;
 +Inf:%>itta # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>itter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ittast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>at # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ete # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>eten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>eti # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>etne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>etne # ;
 +Adj:%>ittande # ;
 +Imp:%>it # ;

LEXICON 269
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>je # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;

LEXICON 269K1
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>je # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;

LEXICON 269K2
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jeer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;

LEXICON 269KL
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jeer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;

LEXICON 270
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>je # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;

LEXICON 270K1
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>je # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;

LEXICON 270K2
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jeer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;

LEXICON 270KL
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jeer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;

LEXICON 271
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>èt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 271K1
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>èt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 271K2
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 271KL
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 272
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>èt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 272K1
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>èt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 272K2
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 272KL
 +Inf:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>a # ;

LEXICON 273
 +Inf:%>ate # ;
 +Inf:%>ata # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>èt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>at # ;

LEXICON 273K1
 +Inf:%>ate # ;
 +Inf:%>ata # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>èt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>at # ;

LEXICON 273K2
 +Inf:%>ate # ;
 +Inf:%>ata # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>at # ;

LEXICON 273KL
 +Inf:%>ate # ;
 +Inf:%>ata # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>at # ;

LEXICON 274
 +Inf:%>ate # ;
 +Inf:%>ata # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>èt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>at # ;

LEXICON 274K1
 +Inf:%>ate # ;
 +Inf:%>ata # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>èt # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>at # ;

LEXICON 274K2
 +Inf:%>ate # ;
 +Inf:%>ata # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eter # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>atas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>ét # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ate # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>aten # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ati # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>atne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>atne # ;
 +Adj:%>atande # ;
 +Imp:%>at # ;
