src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
avskjere+V:avsk 270 ; ! LEMMA_ID=4587
forlate+V:forl 274 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24532
forskjere+V:forsk 270 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24973
kantskjere+V:kantsk 270 ; ! LEMMA_ID=44779
la+V:l 272 ; ! LEMMA_ID=53591
nedlate+V:nedl 274 ; ! LEMMA_ID=64182
omskjere+V:omsk 270 ; ! LEMMA_ID=66698
skjere+V:sk 270 ; ! LEMMA_ID=82481
utelate+V:utel 274 ; ! LEMMA_ID=105681
sitte+V:s 268J ; ! LEMMA_ID=115283
etterlate+V:etterl 274 ; ! LEMMA_ID=122914
oversitte+V:overs 268J ; ! LEMMA_ID=132770
